morphology/task_3/src/task_2/script.foma
# Read and define lexicon
read lexc english.lexc
define Lexicon ;

# Define exceptions
define Exceptions [[{goose} "+N" "+Pl" .x. {geese}] | [{play} "+N" "+Pl" .x. {plays}]] ;

# E insertion: e added after -s, -z, -x, -ch, -sh before s
define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;

# Y replacement: -y changes to -ie before -s
define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s ;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0 ;

# Create final converter
define Grammar Lexicon           .o.
               EInsertion        .o.
               YReplacement      .o.
               Cleanup ;

# Add exceptions to the converter
regex Exceptions .P. Grammar ;
